Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-405
Campus buildings and facilities; revenue bonds; registration; place of payment.

All revenue bonds issued under the provisions of sections 85-403 to 85-411, shall be registered in the office of the Director of Administrative Services of the State of Nebraska. The revenue bonds may be payable at the office of the State Treasurer of Nebraska or such bank or trust company, either within or without the State of Nebraska, or such other place as may be determined by the board.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 3, p. 1076;

Laws 1969, c. 851, § 2, p. 3198.